Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1349.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 304. Project labor agreement.(a) Creation.--The department shall create a project labor agreement on a highway construction project, including a highway construction project that receives funding from the Federal Government, if the department determines that it is necessary to promote labor stability and advance the interests of the Commonwealth in costs, efficiency, skilled labor force, quality, safety and timeliness. The department may not award a contract to a responsible offeror if the offeror fails to agree to the provisions of the project labor agreement under this section, unless certain conditions are met under subsection (f).123456789101112131415161718 (b) Notification.--Along with the solicitation of proposals or bids for a highway construction project, the department shall give public notice that the highway construction project shall include a project labor agreement. The method of public notice may include any of the following:(1) Electronic publication which is accessible to the general public.(2) Advertisement as provided under 45 Pa.C.S. § 306 (relating to use of trade publications).(3) Issuance of request for proposals to offerors on the mailing list of the public entity.(4) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation.(5) If prequalification is a requirement of submitting a proposal, notification to all private entities who have been prequalified by the public entity.(c) Negotiation of agreement.--If it has been determined that a project labor agreement is appropriate for a particular highway construction project, the department shall in good faith negotiate a project labor agreement with one or more labor organizations engaged in the construction industry. If the two parties cannot agree to the terms of the project labor agreement, the Governor shall appoint a designee to assist the department and labor organizations in reaching an agreement.(d) Binding agreement.--A project labor agreement negotiated under this section between the department and one or more labor organizations shall be binding on all contractors and subcontractors working on the highway construction project and may include provisions that:(1) Permit contractors and subcontractors working on the highway construction project to retain a percentage of their 20250HB1349PN1537 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 current workforce.(2) The responsible offeror who is awarded a contract and any subcontractor of the offeror is not required to be a party to any other labor agreement with the labor organizations other than for the highway construction project covered by the project labor agreement.(e) Contents.--(1) A project labor agreement executed under this section shall:(i) Provide effective, immediate and mutually binding procedures for resolving jurisdictional labor disputes and grievances arising before the completion of the work.(ii) Contain guarantees against strikes, lockouts or similar actions.(iii) Bind all contractors and subcontractors on the highway construction project through the inclusion of appropriate bid specifications in all relevant bid documents.(iv) Require all contractors and subcontractors to obtain not less than 10% of their workforce from the hiring halls of signatory unions or local labor within the county or engineering district in which the project is located.(v) Include that a percentage of the workforce is to be composed of apprentices in the construction trade.(vi) Set goals for apprenticeship hours to be performed by underrepresented groups and women and specify goals for total hours to be performed by underrepresented groups and women.20250HB1349PN1537 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Include other terms as the parties deem appropriate.(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as requiring a responsible offeror to be a member of any labor organization.(f) Applicability.--Within each county or engineering district in which a highway construction project is located, the department shall determine if there are adequate amounts of labor organizations or local laborers within the construction industry that are necessary to comply with the contents of the agreement under subsection (d). If there are insufficient amounts of labor organizations or local laborers within the county or engineering district in which the highway construction project is located, or a labor organization cannot refer a sufficient number of laborers to a contractor or subcontractor within a 72-hour period, the department may set aside workforce requirements under the project labor agreement.(g) Compliance.--The department shall ensure that all highway construction projects containing a project labor agreement are implemented in a manner consistent with the provisions of this section and are in full compliance with all relevant statutes and regulations.(h) Annual report.--(1) Every January 1 after the effective date of this section, the department shall submit an annual report to the Governor and General Assembly. The report shall include the following:(i) Highway construction projects that include project labor agreements.(ii) Workforce statistics on the highway 20250HB1349PN1537 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 construction projects, including the percentage of local labor used.(iii) The status of the highway construction project and whether the highway construction project was completed on time and reasons for why the highway construction project was not completed on time.(iv) Apprenticeship hours completed by women or underrepresented groups.(v) Any occurrences when the department chose to set aside workforce labor requirements under subsection (f) and reasons for the decision.(vi) Any other information deemed appropriate by the department.(2) The report shall be submitted to the following members of the General Assembly:(i) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(ii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(i) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Highway construction project." The creation, repair, maintenance, expansion or other construction of a highway owned by the Commonwealth with an estimated total cost of $2,000,000 or greater."Hiring hall." A system or organization, often operated by a labor organization, where employers go to find employees to fill 20250HB1349PN1537 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 job openings, and the labor organization manages the process of referring workers to employers and ensures that workers are selected based on established criteria."Labor organization." As defined in section 3 of the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act."Local labor." Laborers or skilled craftsmen in the construction industry who are residents of a county or engineering district in which a transportation project is located."Project labor agreement." A form of a pre-hire collective bargaining agreement covering the terms and conditions of a specific project."Underrepresented groups." African Americans, Hispanic Americans, Native Americans, Asian Americans, Alaskans or Pacific Islanders.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1349PN1537 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617